New York, session 2025-2026, S1236.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. Virtual access by the public to commission proceedings and elec- 4 tronic filing of documents. 1. As used in this section: 5 (a) "Document" shall include, but not be limited to, oral and written 6 testimony, exhibits, interrogatories, and motions, briefs, comments, 7 rulings, orders and any other materials filed in or generated as part of 8 a proceeding. 9 (b) "Proceedings" shall mean any formal or informal matter, case, 10 rulemaking, rate proceeding, generic proceeding, or any other action of 11 the commission or the department or any component of a proceeding that 12 may result in decisions by the commission or recommendations to the 13 commission. Such term shall include evidentiary hearings conducted 14 pursuant to section sixty-six of this chapter. 15 2. The commission shall provide for virtual and in-person access and 16 participation for all proceedings regarding gas, electric, combination 17 gas and electric, and water utilities. In the case of settlement negoti- 18 ations, virtual and in-person access and participation shall be limited 19 to persons admitted as parties and who subscribe to the applicable 20 commission rules and standards governing confidentiality. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01460-02-6 S. 1236--A 2 1 3. The commission and administrative law judges shall accept electron- 2 ic submission of documents in all proceedings and physical copies shall 3 not be required. A filing party shall submit documents in an alternative 4 format only upon certification that electronic submission is not practi- 5 cable. Such documents shall be in a form and manner as prescribed by the 6 commission. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 9 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 10 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 11 completed on or before such effective date.